Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1894XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 326 Section 1. FINDINGS. The general assembly finds all of the 1 following: 2 1. The Iowa general assembly, in conjunction with state 3 agencies, has a duty to ensure Iowa children have access to 4 food and essential nutrition regardless of income level. 5 2. Summer can be a time of increased hunger for children who 6 no longer have access to regular school lunches. 7 3. Iowa is currently experiencing a food insecurity crisis 8 as food banks and other charitable organizations continue to 9 report record high demand from Iowans in need. 10 4. There are an estimated two hundred forty thousand 11 children in Iowa who would be eligible to receive benefits 12 under the summer electronic benefits transfer (EBT) for 13 children program (SUN bucks program), as established as a 14 permanent program under the federal Consolidated Appropriations 15 Act, 2023, 42 U.S.C. Â§1762. 16 5. When Iowans are struggling financially, they are more 17 likely to buy less expensive foods, which are high in calories 18 and low in nutritional value. 19 6. Summer congregate and noncongregate meals are not always 20 easily accessible to families in need, particularly in rural 21 Iowa. 22 7. The SUN bucks program offered by the federal government 23 would provide an estimated twenty-nine million dollars to 24 address the food insecurity crisis, which not only feeds 25 children but stimulates local economic activity. 26 8. Iowa ended fiscal year 2023-2024 with a general fund 27 balance of two billion fifty-three million dollars. Iowa 28 can afford to feed hungry children and cover the costs of 29 administering the SUN bucks program. 30 Sec. 2. PARTICIPATION IN SUN BUCKS PROGRAM ââ 31 APPROPRIATION. 32 1. The department of health and human services, in 33 coordination with the department of education, shall do all of 34 the following: 35 -1- LSB 1894XS (3) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 326 a. Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, submit a 1 letter of intent to the United States secretary of agriculture 2 to apply for and participate in the SUN bucks program offered 3 by the United States department of agriculture food and 4 nutrition service to provide eligible families with EBT benefit 5 cards to purchase food from participating stores during summer 6 2025. 7 b. Coordinate with the United States department of 8 agriculture food and nutrition service to develop a successful 9 management and administration plan for the SUN bucks program, 10 and submit the plan to the United States secretary of 11 agriculture by April 1, 2025. 12 2. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 13 to the department of health and human services for the fiscal 14 year beginning July 1, 2024, a sufficient amount to cover the 15 costs of administering the SUN bucks program during summer 16 2025. Moneys appropriated under this section that remain 17 unexpended or unencumbered at the close of the fiscal year 18 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure in 19 the succeeding fiscal year. 20 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 21 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 22 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 23 retroactively to July 1, 2024. 24